Hawaii statutes.
PART 7.
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

§490:7-701 Applicability. This article
applies to a document of title that is issued or a bailment that arises on or
after July 2, 2004. This article does not apply to a document of title that is
issued or a bailment that arises before July 2, 2004 even if the document of
title or bailment would be subject to this article if the document of title had
been issued or bailment had arisen on or after July 2, 2004. This article does
not apply to a right of action that has accrued before July 2, 2004. [L 2004, c
163, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"July 2, 2004" substituted for "the effective
date of this article".

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next